South Dakota, session 2026, SB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-30-18.1 be AMENDED:
32-30-18.1. Any owner of a motor vehicle who intentionally abandons a motor
vehicle on any public highway or right-of-way is civilly liable to the removal agency for
the expense of towing the motor vehicle if:
(1) The owner intentionally abandons a motor vehicle on any public highway or right
of way;
(2) The owner drives, or allows the motor vehicle to be driven, into any lake, stream,
or body of water where the motor vehicle becomes disabled; and
(3) The owner drives, or allows the motor vehicle to be driven, onto any frozen lake,
stream, or body of water where the motor vehicle breaks through the ice and
becomes disabled.
The owner is also civilly liable for any storage expense pursuant to § 32-36-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.